Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1055
Teaching, defined.

Teaching means the act of imparting and demonstrating knowledge of cosmetology, nail technology, esthetics, or electrology theory and practices to students, nail technology students, or apprentices in an apprentice salon, a school of cosmetology, a nail technology school, or a school of esthetics by an instructor, an esthetics instructor, a nail technology instructor, a nail technology student instructor, or a student instructor for the purpose of preparing the students, nail technology students, nail technology student instructors, or apprentices to engage in the occupations of cosmetology, nail technology, esthetics, or electrology.

Laws 1986, LB 318, § 32;

Laws 1995, LB 83, § 14;

Laws 1999, LB 68, § 20;

Laws 2002, LB 241, § 17;

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 24;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-371;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 317.